dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="súš__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ach</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of súš__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- súš__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="beznádej__BASESG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="syrin/x__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xu</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xu</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>x</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xe</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>x</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gom</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xom</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>x</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gov</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xov</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gom</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xom</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xy</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>goch</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xoch</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xy</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gmi</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xmi</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xy</l>
        <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="syrinx"><i>syrin</i><par n="syrin/x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súš"><i>súš</i><par n="súš__n"/></e>
